Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
R

ECREATIONAL AUTHORITIES OVERVIEW COMMITTEE

12-3-20. Creation of committee; members and organization; duty to review operations of Stone Mountain Memorial Association, Jekyll Island - State Park Authority, North Georgia Mountains Authority, and Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority.

There is created as a joint committee of the General Assembly the Recreational Authorities Overview Committee to be composed of three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and three members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate. The members of the committee shall serve two-year terms concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. The chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from the membership of the committee, and the vice chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the committee. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall serve terms of two years concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. Vacancies in an appointed member's position or in the offices of chairperson or vice chairperson of the committee shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. The committee shall periodically inquire into and review the operations of the Stone Mountain Memorial Association, the North Georgia Mountains Authority, and the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority and shall periodically review and evaluate the success with which each of the said authorities is accomplishing its statutory duties and functions as provided in this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 2/HB 214.)

12-3-21. Assistance by state officers and agencies.

The state auditor, the Attorney General, and all other agencies of state government, upon request by the committee, shall assist the committee in the discharge of its duties as set forth in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2.)

12-3-22. Reporting requirements; enforcement.

The Stone Mountain Memorial Association, the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority, the North Georgia Mountains Authority, and the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority shall cooperate with the committee, its agents, the Attorney General, the state auditor, the state accounting officer, and other state agencies in order that the duties of the committee set forth in this part may be timely and efficiently discharged. Each of the named authorities shall submit to the committee such reports and data as the committee shall reasonably require of the authority in order that the committee may adequately perform its functions. At least annually the commissioner of natural resources and the department's director of state parks and historic sites shall make a report to the committee of any legislative changes or revisions that may be needed to assist the named authorities in accomplishing their statutory duties and functions as provided in this chapter, either individually or as a group. The Attorney General is authorized to bring appropriate legal actions to enforce any laws specifically or generally relating to the authorities named in this part. The committee shall, on or before the first day of January of each year, and at such other times as it deems necessary, submit to the chairpersons of the appropriate standing committees of each house of the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations based upon the review of each of the named authorities, as set forth in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 21/HB 293.)

12-3-23. Evaluation criteria.

In the discharge of its duties, the committee shall evaluate the performance of the Stone Mountain Memorial Association, the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority, the North Georgia Mountains Authority, and the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority consistent with the following criteria:

Prudent, legal, and accountable expenditure of public funds;

Efficient operation; and

Performance of its statutory responsibilities.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2.)

12-3-24. Authorized expenditures; compensation of members; funding.

The committee is authorized to expend state funds available to the committee for the discharge of its duties. Said funds may be used for the purposes of compensating staff personnel; paying for services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants; and paying all other necessary expenses incurred by the committee in performing its duties.

The members of the committee shall receive the same compensation, per diem, expenses, and allowances for their service on the committee as is authorized by law for members of interim legislative study committees.

The funds necessary for the purposes of the committee shall come from the funds appropriated to and available to the legislative branch of government.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2.)

12-3-25. Information required in annual reports.

The committee shall report in each of its annual reports to the chairperson of the standing committees of each house of the General Assembly whether or not any of the authorities named in this part have undertaken activities having a projected cost of over $1 million without having first evaluated the feasibility of involving private persons or entities in the development, construction, operation, and management of the authority's existing projects and such proposed activities or has failed to file a copy of such evaluation with the Office of Planning and Budget.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 2.)